Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.36.020

Coupons—Printing facsimile signatures.

A facsimile reproduction of the signature of any of the code city officers referred to in RCW 35A.36.010 may be printed, engraved, or lithographed upon bond coupons with the same effect as though the particular officer had signed the coupon in person.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.36.020.]